Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5116
Several obligors.

The amount of any obligation issued, assumed, or guaranteed by more than one obligor and authorized under more than one provision of the Insurers Investment Act shall be allocated to those provisions on a basis proportional to the obligations of each obligor.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 16.